Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.73, is amended to read: 121A.73 SCHOOL CELL PHONE POLICY. new text begin (a) new text end A school district or charter school must adopt a policy on students' possession and use of cell phones in school by March 15, 2025. The Minnesota Elementary School Principals' Association and the Minnesota Association of Secondary School Principals must collaborate to make best practices available to schools on a range of different strategies in order to minimize the impact of cell phones on student behavior, mental health, and academic attainment. new text begin (b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the school district or charter school's school cell phone policy must prohibit cell phones and smart watches in school for students in grades kindergarten through 8 and prohibit cell phones and smart watches in classrooms for students in grades 9 through 12. The policy must provide exceptions for devices necessary for medical use, exceptions for devices included in an individualized education program for a student with a disability, or other exceptions at the discretion of the school principal. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Student cell phone use; statewide campaign. new text end new text begin (a) For the Department of Education to contract for a statewide campaign regarding the negative effects of screen overuse and misuse on children: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The campaign must be structured to provide information to parents and caregivers as early as possible and be repeated throughout a student's education from early childhood through grade 12. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, one percent of the grant is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (d) Any balance in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin (e) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $........ new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Implementation grants. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to school districts and charter schools to implement the required school cell phone use policies: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) A school district or charter school may apply, in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, for a grant to implement the school cell phone use policy. The grant funds must be used for onetime expenses related to the policy and not ongoing expenses such as employee salaries to enforce the policy. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, one percent of the grant is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin (d) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin (e) These are onetime appropriations. new text end